Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6879YC (3) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 328.17 Prohibited use of automatic 1 dependent surveillance-broadcast data. 2 1. A person shall not collect or use data broadcast by 3 automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast to calculate, 4 generate, impose, or collect fees associated with the operation 5 of aircraft within this state. 6 2. For purposes of this section, âautomatic dependent 7 surveillance-broadcastâ means an advanced aviation surveillance 8 technology that combines ground infrastructure, aircraft 9 avionics, and an aircraftâs positioning source to create an 10 accurate surveillance interface between an aircraft and air 11 traffic control and includes two different services: one 12 that receives data relating to aircraft, weather, and traffic 13 information from ground stations, and the other that broadcasts 14 an aircraftâs global positioning system location, altitude, 15 ground speed, and other data. 16 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect November 1, 17 2026. 18